Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1226
Hearings; rules of evidence applicable.

The rules of evidence applicable in civil proceedings shall apply at all hearings held under the Sex Offender Commitment Act. In no event shall evidence be considered which is inadmissible in criminal proceedings.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 82.